Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.32.070

Manslaughter in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of manslaughter in the second degree when, with criminal negligence, he or she causes the death of another person.

(2) Manslaughter in the second degree is a class B felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 358; 1997 c 365 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.32.070.]